Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1206
Fees; prohibited; civil cases; when disqualified.

No prosecuting attorney shall receive any fee or reward from or on behalf of any prosecutor or other individual for services in any prosecution or business which it shall be his official duty to attend; nor shall he act or be concerned, as an attorney or counsel for either party, other than for the state or county, in any civil action depending upon the same state of facts upon which any criminal prosecution, commenced or prosecuted, shall depend, or depending upon the same state of facts, investigated by him, while acting as county coroner.

Laws 1885, c. 40, § 8, p. 218;

R.S.1913, § 5601;

C.S.1922, § 4918;

C.S.1929, § 26-906;

Laws 1943, c. 56, § 1, p. 223;

R.S.1943, § 23-1206.

Purpose of this section was to make certain that a county attorney should not be influenced by private interests. Stewart v. McCauley, 178 Neb. 412, 133 N.W.2d 921 (1965).

Purpose of the statute is to protect the public by making certain that the duties of county attorney are not influenced by private interest. Roach v. Roach, 174 Neb. 266, 117 N.W.2d 549 (1962).

County attorney is not entitled to attorney's fee taxed as costs in tax foreclosure action. State ex rel. Nebraska State Bar Assn. v. Conover, 166 Neb. 132, 88 N.W.2d 135 (1958).

Attorney's fee could not be allowed for services performed under Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act. Rice v. Rice, 165 Neb. 778, 87 N.W.2d 408 (1958).

In civil action, disqualification of county attorney is waived unless objection thereto is made. Thompson v. Thompson, 151 Neb. 110, 36 N.W.2d 648 (1949).

Where attorney prepared petition for probate of deceased but withdrew his appearance, and appointment to assist in prosecution was made solely through county attorney, there was no disqualification. Jordan v. State, 101 Neb. 430, 163 N.W. 801 (1917).

County attorney cannot recover fee for services in civil action where criminal action was possible. Ress v. Shepherd, 84 Neb. 268, 120 N.W. 1132 (1909).

County attorney, who brought civil action, is not disqualified to prosecute criminal action based on same facts. Fitzgerald v. State, 78 Neb. 1, 110 N.W. 676 (1907).